Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1043
Nonvocational training, defined.

Nonvocational training means the act of imparting knowledge of or skills in any or all of the practices of cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, or electrology to persons not licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act for the purpose of noncommercial use by those receiving such training.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 23;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 11;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 18;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-362;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 305;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 13.